Connecticut, session 2026, SB00010.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of four million seven hundred thousand dollars be
appropriated to the Probate Courts, from the General Fund, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for the increased compensation to
conservators for indigent conserved persons to align with the increase
in minimum wages.